Maine, session 132, LD1913.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. P&SL 1975, c. 25, §4 is amended to read:
Sec. 4. The plantation is also authorized to issue general obligation bonds, not to
exceed the general law, to pay the cost of the acquisition, construction, reconsrtuction
reconstruction, improvement, extension and enlargement of, and equipment for, the electric
power generating facility. Schedules for the payment of the principal and interest on the
bonds shall be established in conformance with the rules and regulations of the Public
Utilities Commission.
Sec. 2. P&SL 1975, c. 25, §5 is amended to read:
Sec. 5. The plantation is also authorized, after it has issued general obligation bonds
for the electric power generating facility, to raise by taxation and appropriate a sum not to
exceed 50% of sufficient to pay the cost of the principal and interest payments on the
general obligation bonds in any year and 50% of the current operating costs for that year.
Sec. 3. P&SL 1975, c. 25, §6 is amended to read:
Page 1 - 132LR2515(03)

Sec. 6. The municipal officers are authorized to issue revenue bonds and to fix by
regulation and revise from time to time and to collect rates, fees and other charges for the
use of or for the services and facilities furnished or to be furnished by the electric power
generating facility; and they are further authorized to appoint a person to collect the rates,
fees and other charges, who may be required by the municipal officers to be bonded
according to Title 30-A, section 5601, before assuming the duties of collection.
Emergency clause. In view of the emergency cited in the preamble, this legislation
takes effect when approved.
Page 2 - 132LR2515(03)